Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4103
Information support sheet.

A health care practitioner who provides prenatal or postnatal care, who administers or requests administration of a prenatal or postnatal screening or diagnostic test that detects Down syndrome, and who receives a test result from such test that indicates a high likelihood or the definite presence of Down syndrome shall deliver to the parents the information support sheet provided by the department under section 71-4104.

Laws 2016, LB891, § 3.